Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.230

Quasi-community property—Disposition at death.

Upon the death of any person domiciled in this state, one-half of any quasi-community property shall belong to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the other one-half of such property shall be subject to disposition at death by the decedent, and in the absence thereof, shall descend in the manner provided for community property under chapter 11.04 RCW.

[ 2008 c 6 s 621; 1988 c 34 s 2; 1986 c 72 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.